Washington statutes.
RCW 18.250.010

Definitions.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Athlete" means a person who participates in exercise, recreation, activities, sport, or games requiring physical strength, range-of-motion, flexibility, body awareness and control, speed, stamina, or agility, and the exercise, recreation, activities, sports, or games are of a type conducted for the benefits of health and wellness in association with an educational institution or professional, amateur, recreational sports club or organization, hospital, or industrial-based organization.

(2) "Athletic injury" means an injury or condition sustained by an athlete that affects the person's participation or performance in exercise, recreation, activities, sport, or games and the injury or condition is within the professional preparation and education of an athletic trainer.

(3) "Athletic trainer" means a health care provider who is licensed under this chapter. An athletic trainer can practice athletic training through the consultation, referral, or guidelines of a licensed health care provider as defined in subsection (7) of this section working within their scope of practice.

(4)(a) "Athletic training" means the application of the following principles and methods as provided by a licensed athletic trainer:

(i) Risk management and prevention of athletic injuries through preactivity screening and evaluation, educational programs, physical conditioning and reconditioning programs, application of commercial products, use of protective equipment, promotion of healthy behaviors, and reduction of environmental risks;

(ii) Recognition, evaluation, and assessment of athletic injuries by obtaining a history of the athletic injury, inspection and palpation of the injured part and associated structures, and performance of specific testing techniques related to stability and function to determine the extent of an injury;

(iii) Immediate care of athletic injuries, including emergency medical situations through the application of first-aid and emergency procedures and techniques for nonlife-threatening or life-threatening athletic injuries;

(iv) Treatment, rehabilitation, and reconditioning of athletic injuries through the application of physical agents and modalities, therapeutic activities and exercise, standard reassessment techniques and procedures, commercial products, and educational programs, in accordance with guidelines established with a licensed health care provider as provided in RCW 18.250.070;

(v) Treatment, rehabilitation, and reconditioning of work-related injuries through the application of physical agents and modalities, therapeutic activities and exercise, standard reassessment techniques and procedures, commercial products, and educational programs, under the direct supervision of and in accordance with a plan of care for an individual worker established by a provider authorized to provide physical medicine and rehabilitation services for injured workers; and

(vi) Referral of an athlete to an appropriately licensed health care provider if the athletic injury requires further definitive care or the injury or condition is outside an athletic trainer's scope of practice, in accordance with RCW 18.250.070.

(b) "Athletic training" does not include:

(i) The use of spinal adjustment or manipulative mobilization of the spine and its immediate articulations;

(ii) Orthotic or prosthetic services with the exception of evaluation, measurement, fitting, and adjustment of temporary, prefabricated or direct-formed orthosis as defined in chapter 18.200 RCW;

(iii) The practice of occupational therapy as defined in chapter 18.59 RCW;

(iv) The practice of acupuncture and Eastern medicine as defined in chapter 18.06 RCW;

(v) Any medical diagnosis; and

(vi) Prescribing legend drugs or controlled substances, or surgery.

(5) "Committee" means the athletic training advisory committee.

(6) "Department" means the department of health.

(7) "Licensed health care provider" means a physician, physician assistant, osteopathic physician, *advanced registered nurse practitioner, naturopath, physical therapist, chiropractor, dentist, massage therapist, acupuncturist, occupational therapist, or podiatric physician and surgeon.

(8) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.

[2023 c 143 s 1; 2020 c 80 s 25; 2019 c 308 s 19; 2016 c 41 s 22; 2014 c 194 s 1; 2007 c 253 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The term "advanced registered nurse practitioner" was changed to "advanced practice registered nurse" by 2024 c 239 s 1, effective June 30, 2027.

Effective date—2020 c 80 ss 12-59: See note following RCW 7.68.030.

Intent—2020 c 80: See note following RCW 18.71A.010.

Findings—2019 c 308: See note following RCW 18.06.010.

Effective date—2016 c 41: See note following RCW 18.108.010.